North Carolina statutes. Chapter 89C. Engineering and Land Surveying.
§ 89C-1.
Short title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The North Carolina Engineering and Land Surveying Act.”

History.

1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1975, c. 681, s. 1.

Local Modification.

New Hanover: 1983, c. 365.

§ 89C-2.
Declarations; prohibitions.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property, and to promote the public welfare, the practice of engineering and the practice of land surveying in this State are hereby declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. It shall be unlawful for any person to practice or to offer to practice engineering or land surveying in this State, as defined in the provisions of this Chapter, or to use in connection with the person’s name or otherwise assume or advertise any title or description tending to convey the impression that the person is either a professional engineer or a professional land surveyor, unless the person has been duly licensed. The right to engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying is a personal right, based on the qualifications of the person as evidenced by the person’s certificate of licensure, which shall not be transferable.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 1; C.S., s. 6055(b); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 89C-3.
Definitions. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Board. — The North Carolina State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors provided for by this Chapter.

(1a)

Business firm. — A partnership, firm, association, or another organization or group that is not a corporation and is acting as a unit.

Engineer. — A person who, by reason of special knowledge and use of the mathematical, physical and engineering sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, acquired by engineering education and engineering experience, is qualified to practice engineering.

Engineer intern. — A person who complies with the requirements for education, experience and character, and has passed an examination on the fundamentals of engineering as provided in this Chapter.

(3a)

Inactive licensee. — A licensee who is not engaged in the practice of engineering or land surveying in this State, but renews his or her license as “inactive” as provided in this Chapter.

Land surveyor intern. — A person who complies with the requirements for education, experience, and character and has passed an examination on the fundamentals of land surveying as provided in this Chapter.

Person. — Any natural person, firm, partnership, corporation or other legal entity.

Practice of engineering. —

Any service or creative work, the adequate performance of which requires engineering education, training, and experience, in the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences to such services or creative work as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, and design of engineering works and systems, planning the use of land and water, engineering surveys, and the observation of construction for the purposes of assuring compliance with drawings and specifications, including the consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, and design for either private or public use, in connection with any utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, work systems, projects, and industrial or consumer products or equipment of a mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, pneumatic or thermal nature, insofar as they involve safeguarding life, health or property, and including such other professional services as may be necessary to the planning, progress and completion of any engineering services.A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice engineering, within the meaning and intent of this Chapter, who practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way represents the person to be a professional engineer, or through the use of some other title implies that the person is a professional engineer or that the person is licensed under this Chapter; or who holds the person out as able to perform, or who does perform any engineering service or work not exempted by this Chapter, or any other service designated by the practitioner which is recognized as engineering.

The term “practice of engineering” shall not be construed to permit the location, description, establishment or reestablishment of property lines or descriptions of land boundaries for conveyance. The term does not include the assessment of an underground storage tank required by applicable rules at closure or change in service unless there has been a discharge or release of the product from the tank.

Practice of land surveying. —

Providing professional services such as consultation, investigation, testimony, evaluation, planning, mapping, assembling, and interpreting reliable scientific measurements and information relative to the location, size, shape, or physical features of the earth, improvements on the earth, the space above the earth, or any part of the earth, whether the gathering of information for the providing of these services is accomplished by conventional ground measurements, by aerial photography, by global positioning via satellites, or by a combination of any of these methods, and the utilization and development of these facts and interpretations into an orderly survey map, plan, report, description, or project. The practice of land surveying includes the following:

Locating, relocating, establishing, laying out, or retracing any property line, easement, or boundary of any tract of land;

Locating, relocating, establishing, or laying out the alignment or elevation of any of the fixed works embraced within the practice of professional engineering;

Making any survey for the subdivision of any tract of land, including the topography, alignment and grades of streets and incidental drainage within the subdivision, and the preparation and perpetuation of maps, record plats, field note records, and property descriptions that represent these surveys;

Determining, by the use of the principles of land surveying, the position for any survey monument or reference point, or setting, resetting, or replacing any survey monument or reference point;

Determining the configuration or contour of the earth’s surface or the position of fixed objects on the earth’s surface by measuring lines and angles and applying the principles of mathematics or photogrammetry;

Providing geodetic surveying which includes surveying for determination of the size and shape of the earth both horizontally and vertically and the precise positioning of points on the earth utilizing angular and linear measurements through spatially oriented spherical geometry; and

Creating, preparing, or modifying electronic or computerized data, including land information systems and geographic information systems relative to the performance of the practice of land surveying.

The term “practice of land surveying” shall not be construed to permit the design or preparation of specifications for (i) major highways; (ii) wastewater systems; (iii) wastewater or industrial waste treatment works; (iv) pumping or lift stations; (v) water supply, treatment, or distribution systems; (vi) streets or storm sewer systems except as incidental to a subdivision.

Professional engineer. — A person who has been duly licensed as a professional engineer by the Board established by this Chapter.

(8a)

Professional engineer, retired. — A person who has been duly licensed as a professional engineer by the Board and who chooses to relinquish or not to renew a license and who applies to and is approved by the Board after review of record, including any disciplinary action, to be granted the use of the honorific title “Professional Engineer, Retired”.

Professional land surveyor. — A person who, by reason of special knowledge of mathematics, surveying principles and methods, and legal requirements which are acquired by education and/or practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of land surveying, as attested by the person’s licensure as a professional land surveyor by the Board.

(9a)

Professional land surveyor, retired. — A person who has been duly licensed as a professional land surveyor by the Board and who chooses to relinquish or not to renew a license and who applies to and is approved by the Board after review of record, including any disciplinary action, to be granted the use of the honorific title “Professional Land Surveyor, Retired”.

Responsible charge. — Direct control and personal supervision, either of engineering work or of land surveying, as the case may be.

History.

1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 999, s. 1; 1973, c. 449; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(i); 1998-118, s. 2; 2011-304, s. 1; 2013-98, s. 1.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the repeal of subdivision (4) and the addition of subdivision (4a) by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 1, effective June 26, 2011, in subdivisions (8a) and (9a), inserted “after review of record, including any disciplinary action.”

Session Laws 2013-98, s. 1, effective June 12, 2013, made minor stylistic changes in subdivisions (3) and (3a); added “but renews his or her license as ‘inactive’ as provided in this Chapter” in subsection (3a); and, in subdivision (4), substituted “complies with the requirements for education, experience, and character and has” for “has qualified for, taken, and” and “fundamentals” for “basic disciplines.”

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(a), deleted subdivision (4); and added subdivision (4a). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-3.
Definitions. [Effective July 1, 2022]

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Board. — The North Carolina State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors provided for by this Chapter.

(1a)

Business firm. — A partnership, firm, association, or another organization or group that is not a corporation and is acting as a unit.

Engineer. — A person who, by reason of special knowledge and use of the mathematical, physical and engineering sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, acquired by engineering education and engineering experience, is qualified to practice engineering.

Engineer intern. — A person who complies with the requirements for education, experience and character, and has passed an examination on the fundamentals of engineering as provided in this Chapter.

(3a)

Inactive licensee. — A licensee who is not engaged in the practice of engineering or land surveying in this State, but renews his or her license as “inactive” as provided in this Chapter.

Repealed by Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

(4a)

Land surveyor apprenticeship. — A program of on-the-job learning that allows individuals to prepare for the land surveying profession through supervised experience combined with land surveyor–related classroom instruction as approved by the Board.

Person. — Any natural person, firm, partnership, corporation or other legal entity.

Practice of engineering. —

Any service or creative work, the adequate performance of which requires engineering education, training, and experience, in the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences to such services or creative work as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, and design of engineering works and systems, planning the use of land and water, engineering surveys, and the observation of construction for the purposes of assuring compliance with drawings and specifications, including the consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, and design for either private or public use, in connection with any utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, work systems, projects, and industrial or consumer products or equipment of a mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, pneumatic or thermal nature, insofar as they involve safeguarding life, health or property, and including such other professional services as may be necessary to the planning, progress and completion of any engineering services.A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice engineering, within the meaning and intent of this Chapter, who practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way represents the person to be a professional engineer, or through the use of some other title implies that the person is a professional engineer or that the person is licensed under this Chapter; or who holds the person out as able to perform, or who does perform any engineering service or work not exempted by this Chapter, or any other service designated by the practitioner which is recognized as engineering.

The term “practice of engineering” shall not be construed to permit the location, description, establishment or reestablishment of property lines or descriptions of land boundaries for conveyance. The term does not include the assessment of an underground storage tank required by applicable rules at closure or change in service unless there has been a discharge or release of the product from the tank.

Practice of land surveying. —

Providing professional services such as consultation, investigation, testimony, evaluation, planning, mapping, assembling, and interpreting reliable scientific measurements and information relative to the location, size, shape, or physical features of the earth, improvements on the earth, the space above the earth, or any part of the earth, whether the gathering of information for the providing of these services is accomplished by conventional ground measurements, by aerial photography, by global positioning via satellites, or by a combination of any of these methods, and the utilization and development of these facts and interpretations into an orderly survey map, plan, report, description, or project. The practice of land surveying includes the following:

Locating, relocating, establishing, laying out, or retracing any property line, easement, or boundary of any tract of land;

Locating, relocating, establishing, or laying out the alignment or elevation of any of the fixed works embraced within the practice of professional engineering;

Making any survey for the subdivision of any tract of land, including the topography, alignment and grades of streets and incidental drainage within the subdivision, and the preparation and perpetuation of maps, record plats, field note records, and property descriptions that represent these surveys;

Determining, by the use of the principles of land surveying, the position for any survey monument or reference point, or setting, resetting, or replacing any survey monument or reference point;

Determining the configuration or contour of the earth’s surface or the position of fixed objects on the earth’s surface by measuring lines and angles and applying the principles of mathematics or photogrammetry;

Providing geodetic surveying which includes surveying for determination of the size and shape of the earth both horizontally and vertically and the precise positioning of points on the earth utilizing angular and linear measurements through spatially oriented spherical geometry; and

Creating, preparing, or modifying electronic or computerized data, including land information systems and geographic information systems relative to the performance of the practice of land surveying.

The term “practice of land surveying” shall not be construed to permit the design or preparation of specifications for (i) major highways; (ii) wastewater systems; (iii) wastewater or industrial waste treatment works; (iv) pumping or lift stations; (v) water supply, treatment, or distribution systems; (vi) streets or storm sewer systems except as incidental to a subdivision.

Professional engineer. — A person who has been duly licensed as a professional engineer by the Board established by this Chapter.

(8a)

Professional engineer, retired. — A person who has been duly licensed as a professional engineer by the Board and who chooses to relinquish or not to renew a license and who applies to and is approved by the Board after review of record, including any disciplinary action, to be granted the use of the honorific title “Professional Engineer, Retired”.

Professional land surveyor. — A person who, by reason of special knowledge of mathematics, surveying principles and methods, and legal requirements which are acquired by education and/or practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of land surveying, as attested by the person’s licensure as a professional land surveyor by the Board.

(9a)

Professional land surveyor, retired. — A person who has been duly licensed as a professional land surveyor by the Board and who chooses to relinquish or not to renew a license and who applies to and is approved by the Board after review of record, including any disciplinary action, to be granted the use of the honorific title “Professional Land Surveyor, Retired”.

Responsible charge. — Direct control and personal supervision, either of engineering work or of land surveying, as the case may be.

History.

1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 999, s. 1; 1973, c. 449; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(i); 1998-118, s. 2; 2011-304, s. 1; 2013-98, s. 1; 2022-1, s. 1(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the repeal of subdivision (4) and the addition of subdivision (4a) by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(a), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 1, effective June 26, 2011, in subdivisions (8a) and (9a), inserted “after review of record, including any disciplinary action.”

Session Laws 2013-98, s. 1, effective June 12, 2013, made minor stylistic changes in subdivisions (3) and (3a); added “but renews his or her license as ‘inactive’ as provided in this Chapter” in subsection (3a); and, in subdivision (4), substituted “complies with the requirements for education, experience, and character and has” for “has qualified for, taken, and” and “fundamentals” for “basic disciplines.”

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(a), deleted subdivision (4); and added subdivision (4a). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-4.
State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors; appointment; terms.

A State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors, whose duty it is to administer the provisions of this Chapter, is created. The Board shall consist of four licensed professional engineers, three licensed professional land surveyors and two public members, who are neither professional engineers nor professional land surveyors. Of the land surveyor members, one and only one may hold dual licenses as a professional land surveyor and professional engineer. All of the members shall be appointed by the Governor. Appointments of the engineer and land surveyor members shall preferably, but not necessarily, be made from a list of nominees submitted by the professional societies for engineers and land surveyors in this State. Each member of the Board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the Governor and shall file with the Secretary of State a written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of the duties.

Members of the Board serve for staggered five-year terms, and no member may be appointed for more than two full terms. Members serve until the expiration of their respective terms and until their respective successors are appointed. If a vacancy occurs during a term, the Governor shall appoint a successor from the same classification as the person causing the vacancy to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the vacancy is not filled within 90 days after it occurs, the Board may appoint a provisional member to serve until the appointment by the Governor becomes effective. The provisional member during his tenure has all the powers and duties of a regular member.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1979, c. 819, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 3.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

§ 89C-5.
Board members; qualifications.

Each engineer member of the Board shall be a resident of North Carolina and shall be a licensed professional engineer engaged in the lawful practice of engineering in North Carolina for at least six years.

Each land surveyor member of the Board shall be a resident of North Carolina and shall be a licensed professional land surveyor engaged in the lawful practice of land surveying in North Carolina for at least six years.

Each public member of the Board shall be a resident of North Carolina.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1979, c. 819, s. 2; 1989, c. 108; 1998-118, s. 4.

§ 89C-6.
Compensation and expenses of Board members.

Each member of the Board, when attending to the work of the Board or any of its committees, shall receive as compensation for services the per diem and, in addition, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses and incidentals not exceeding the maximum set forth by law. In addition to per diem allowances, travel and incidentals, the secretary of the Board may, with the approval of the Board, receive such reasonable additional compensation as is compatible with the actual hours of work required by the duties of the office.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 5.

§ 89C-7.
Vacancies; removal of member.

The Governor may remove any member of the Board for misconduct, incompetency, neglect of duty, or any sufficient cause, in the manner prescribed by law for removal of State officials. Vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the Governor as provided in

G.S. 89C-4

.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1.

§ 89C-8.
Organization of the Board; meetings; election of officers.

The Board shall hold at least two regular meetings each year. Special meetings may be held at such times and upon such notice as the rules and regulations of the Board may provide. The Board shall elect annually from its members a chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary. A quorum of the Board shall consist of not less than five members. The Board shall operate under its rules and regulations supplemented by Robert’s Rules of Order.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 6.

§ 89C-9.
Executive director; duties and liabilities.

The Board shall employ an executive director who is not a member of the Board. The executive director shall be a full-time employee of the Board and perform the duties assigned to the director by the secretary subject to the approval of the Board. The executive director shall receive a salary and compensation fixed by the Board. The executive director shall give a surety bond satisfactory to the Board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the director’s duties assigned. The premium on the bond shall be a necessary and proper expense of the Board.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 7.

§ 89C-10.
Board powers. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

The Board may adopt and amend all rules and rules of procedure as may be reasonably necessary for the proper performance of its duties, the regulation of its procedures, meetings, records, the administration of examinations, and the authority to enforce the rules of professional conduct as may be adopted by the Board pursuant to

G.S. 89C-20

.The action by the Board in carrying out any of the powers specified in this section shall be binding upon all persons licensed under this Chapter, including corporations and business firms holding certificates of authorization.

The Board shall adopt and have an official seal, which shall be affixed to each certificate issued.

The Board may in the name of the State apply for relief, by injunction, in the established manner provided in cases of civil procedure, without bond, to enforce the provisions of this Chapter, or to restrain any violation of the provisions of this Chapter. In proceedings for injunctive relief, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, or that substantial or irreparable damage would result from the continued violation of the provisions of this Chapter. The members of the Board shall not be personally liable under this proceeding.

The Board may subject an applicant for licensure to any examination necessary to determine the applicant’s qualifications.

The Board may issue an appropriate certificate of licensure to any applicant who, in the opinion of the Board, has met the requirements of this Chapter.

It shall be the responsibility and duty of the Board to conduct a regular program of investigation concerning all matters within its jurisdiction under the provisions of this Chapter. The investigation of a licensee is confidential until the Board issues a citation to the licensee. The Board may expend its funds for salaries, fees, and per diem expenses, in connection with its investigations, provided that no funds other than per diem expenses shall be paid to any member of the Board in connection with its investigations, nor may any member of the Board give testimony and later sit in deciding on any matter which may directly involve punitive action for the testimony.

The Board may use its funds to establish and conduct instructional programs for persons who are currently licensed to practice engineering or land surveying, as well as refresher courses for persons interested in obtaining adequate instruction or programs of study to qualify them for licensure to practice engineering or land surveying. The Board may expend its funds for these purposes and may not only conduct, sponsor, and arrange for instructional programs, but also may carry out instructional programs through extension courses or other media. The Board may enter into plans or agreements with community colleges, public or private institutions of higher learning, State and county boards of education, or with the governing authority of any industrial education center for the purpose of planning, scheduling or arranging courses, instruction, extension courses, or in assisting in obtaining courses of study or programs in the field of engineering and land surveying. The Board shall encourage the educational institutions in this State to offer courses necessary to complete the educational requirements of this Chapter. For the purpose of carrying out these objectives, the Board may adopt rules as may be necessary for the educational programs, instruction, extension services, or for entering into plans or contracts with persons or educational and industrial institutions.

The Board may license sponsors of continuing professional competency activities who agree to conduct programs in accordance with standards adopted by the Board. Sponsors shall pay a license fee established by the Board, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for licensure under this subsection. The license fee shall accompany the application. Sponsors shall renew their licenses annually on a form provided by the Board.

The Board shall have the power to acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only to approval of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral pledged by the Board for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the Board.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 977, s. 16; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 8; 1998-118, s. 8; 2003-347, s. 1.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made subsection (g) and the third sentence of subsection (f), as added by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(c), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(c), added the third sentence of subsection (f); and added subsection (g). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-10.
Board powers. [Effective July 1, 2022]

The Board may adopt and amend all rules and rules of procedure as may be reasonably necessary for the proper performance of its duties, the regulation of its procedures, meetings, records, the administration of examinations, and the authority to enforce the rules of professional conduct as may be adopted by the Board pursuant to

G.S. 89C-20

.The action by the Board in carrying out any of the powers specified in this section shall be binding upon all persons licensed under this Chapter, including corporations and business firms holding certificates of authorization.

The Board shall adopt and have an official seal, which shall be affixed to each certificate issued.

The Board may in the name of the State apply for relief, by injunction, in the established manner provided in cases of civil procedure, without bond, to enforce the provisions of this Chapter, or to restrain any violation of the provisions of this Chapter. In proceedings for injunctive relief, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, or that substantial or irreparable damage would result from the continued violation of the provisions of this Chapter. The members of the Board shall not be personally liable under this proceeding.

The Board may subject an applicant for licensure to any examination necessary to determine the applicant’s qualifications.

The Board may issue an appropriate certificate of licensure to any applicant who, in the opinion of the Board, has met the requirements of this Chapter.

It shall be the responsibility and duty of the Board to conduct a regular program of investigation concerning all matters within its jurisdiction under the provisions of this Chapter. The investigation of a licensee is confidential until the Board issues a citation to the licensee. The investigation of a nonlicensee is confidential until the Board approves any action authorized under this Chapter against the nonlicensee. The Board may expend its funds for salaries, fees, and per diem expenses, in connection with its investigations, provided that no funds other than per diem expenses shall be paid to any member of the Board in connection with its investigations, nor may any member of the Board give testimony and later sit in deciding on any matter which may directly involve punitive action for the testimony.

The Board may use its funds to establish and conduct instructional programs for persons who are currently licensed to practice engineering or land surveying, as well as refresher courses for persons interested in obtaining adequate instruction or programs of study to qualify them for licensure to practice engineering or land surveying. The Board may expend its funds for these purposes and may not only conduct, sponsor, and arrange for instructional programs, but also may carry out instructional programs through extension courses or other media. The Board may enter into plans or agreements with community colleges, public or private institutions of higher learning, State and county boards of education, or with the governing authority of any industrial education center for the purpose of planning, scheduling or arranging courses, instruction, extension courses, or in assisting in obtaining courses of study or programs in the field of engineering and land surveying. The Board shall encourage the educational institutions in this State to offer courses necessary to complete the educational requirements of this Chapter. For the purpose of carrying out these objectives, the Board may adopt rules as may be necessary for the educational programs, instruction, extension services, or for entering into plans or contracts with persons or educational and industrial institutions.

(g1)

The Board shall review and promulgate rules establishing continuing education requirements for surveying apprenticeships and encourage the workforce development of the profession.

The Board may license sponsors of continuing professional competency activities who agree to conduct programs in accordance with standards adopted by the Board. Sponsors shall pay a license fee established by the Board, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for licensure under this subsection. The license fee shall accompany the application. Sponsors shall renew their licenses annually on a form provided by the Board.

The Board shall have the power to acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only to approval of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral pledged by the Board for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the Board.

History.

1921, c. 1, ss. 3-6; C.S., ss. 6055(d)-6055(g); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1957, c. 1060, s. 1; 1963, c. 843; 1965, c. 940; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 977, s. 16; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 8; 1998-118, s. 8; 2003-347, s. 1; 2022-1, s. 1(c).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made subsection (g) and the third sentence of subsection (f), as added by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(c), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(c), added the third sentence of subsection (f); and added subsection (g). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-11.
Secretary; duties and liabilities; expenditures. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

The secretary of the Board shall receive and account for all moneys derived from the operation of the Board as provided in this Chapter, and shall deposit them in one or more special funds in banks or other financial institutions carrying deposit insurance and authorized to do business in North Carolina. The fund or funds shall be designated as “Fund of the Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors” and shall be drawn against only for the purpose of implementing provisions of this Chapter as herein provided. All expenses certified by the Board as properly and necessarily incurred in the discharge of its duties, including authorized compensation, shall be paid out of this fund on the warrant signed by the secretary of the Board. At no time shall the total of warrants issued exceed the total amount of funds accumulated under this Chapter. The secretary of the Board shall give a surety bond satisfactory to the State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties assigned. The premium on the bond is a proper and necessary expense of the Board. The secretary of the Board may delegate to the executive director certain routine duties, such as receipt and disbursement of funds in stated amounts by a written authorization, which has the majority approval of the Board.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 7; C.S., s. 6055(h); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1959, c. 617; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 9; 2011-304, s. 2.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 2, effective June 26, 2011, substituted “majority approval of the Board” for “unanimous approval of the Board” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(d), deleted “on the warrant signed by the secretary of the Board” following “fund” at end of the third sentence; and substituted “total of such certified expenses” for “total of warrants” near the middle of the fourth sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 89C-11.
Secretary; duties and liabilities; expenditures. [Effective July 1, 2022]

The secretary of the Board shall receive and account for all moneys derived from the operation of the Board as provided in this Chapter, and shall deposit them in one or more special funds in banks or other financial institutions carrying deposit insurance and authorized to do business in North Carolina. The fund or funds shall be designated as “Fund of the Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors” and shall be drawn against only for the purpose of implementing provisions of this Chapter as herein provided. All expenses certified by the Board as properly and necessarily incurred in the discharge of its duties, including authorized compensation, shall be paid out of this fund. At no time shall the total of such certified expenses issued exceed the total amount of funds accumulated under this Chapter. The secretary of the Board shall give a surety bond satisfactory to the State Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties assigned. The premium on the bond is a proper and necessary expense of the Board. The secretary of the Board may delegate to the executive director certain routine duties, such as receipt and disbursement of funds in stated amounts by a written authorization, which has the majority approval of the Board.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 7; C.S., s. 6055(h); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1959, c. 617; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 9; 2011-304, s. 2; 2022-1, s. 1(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(g), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws
2022-1, s. 1(d), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 2, effective June 26, 2011, substituted “majority approval of the Board” for “unanimous approval of the Board” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(d), deleted “on the warrant signed by the secretary of the Board” following “fund” at end of the third sentence; and substituted “total of such certified expenses” for “total of warrants” near the middle of the fourth sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.